North Dakota, session 69, HB1074.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 37-01-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
37-01-03. Articles of uniform code of military justice applicable in state - Regulations
governing - Punishment for offenses while on duty.
The articles of uniform code of military justice [10 U.S.C. 801-950] in effect on December 31,
20222024, governing the armed forces of the United States and the Manual for Courts-Martial, United
States, 20192024 edition, are a part of this title so far as the articles are applicable and not modified by
any provision of this title. An individual who commits an offense while on military duty status, including
state active duty, may be tried by a court-martial lawfully appointed even after the duty has terminated,
and if found guilty, the accused must be punished according to the articles of uniform code of military
justice and the rules and regulations governing the armed forces of the United States, within the limits
prescribed in this title and by federal law for the courts-martial in the national guard. In any case in
which the individual alleged to have committed the offense could be charged either under the code of
military justice or the civil law of this state, the officer whose duty it is to approve the charge, in the
officer's discretion, may order the person charged or subject to being charged to be turned over to the
civil authorities for trial. Commanders may administer nonjudicial punishment for offenses while on
military duty status, including state active duty, in accordance with part V, Manual for Courts-Martial,
except the service member may not demand a trial by courts-martial. When reference is made to the
articles of uniform code of military justice, to the military service, or to the armed forces of the United
States, the reference must be deemed to include the military service of this state. Laws of this state
affecting the military forces must be construed to conform to all acts and regulations of the United
States affecting the same subjects.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 37-01-43 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
37-01-43. North Dakota military civil relief act.
An individual called or ordered to active service for thirty consecutive days or longer has all of the
protections afforded to persons in the military service of the United States under the Servicemembers
Civil Relief Act [50 U.S.C. 3901-4043] in effect on December 31, 20222024.

H. B. NO. 1074 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1074.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State